Massachusetts, session 194th, H4903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 74 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 59. There is hereby established a pilot program known as the commercial driver’s
license (CDL) program that shall be administered by Madison Park Technical Vocational High
School in the city of Boston to provide training for transit driving. The program will provide
classroom and off-site training. The registry of motor vehicles, in consultation with the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation, may adopt regulations necessary for the
administration of the pilot program and shall collect fees from adult participants pursuant to such
regulations.
of 1